Washington statutes.
RCW 13.24.060

Responsibilities of state departments, agencies and officers.

The courts, departments, agencies and officers of this state and its subdivisions shall enforce this compact and shall do all things appropriate to the effectuation of its purposes and intent which may be within their respective jurisdictions.

[ 1955 c 284 s 6.]